Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2604
Pharmaceutical
agents, defined.

(1) Pharmaceutical agents, for
diagnostic purposes, means anesthetics, cycloplegics, and mydriatics.

(2) Pharmaceutical agents, for therapeutic purposes, means
topical ophthalmic pharmaceutical agents which treat eye diseases, infection,
inflammation, and superficial abrasions, or oral analgesics, including oral
analgesics enumerated in Schedules III and IV of section 28-405 necessary
to treat conditions of the eye, ocular adnexa, or visual system, or oral pharmaceutical
agents for the treatment of diseases or infections of the eye, ocular adnexa,
or visual system, or oral anti-inflammatory agents to treat conditions of
the eye, ocular adnexa, or visual system.

(3) Pharmaceutical
agents, for therapeutic purposes, includes an epinephrine autoinjector for
treatment of anaphylaxis and an oral steroid, oral glaucoma agent, or oral
immunosuppressive agent.

Laws 1979, LB 9, § 4;

Laws 1986, LB 131, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 429, § 4;

Laws 1998, LB 369, § 4;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,135.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 876;

Laws 2014, LB526, § 1.